Foma_files/engguesser.foma
# Our lexicon

def C [b|c|d|f|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z];
def V [a|e|i|o|u|y];

def Word [C|V]+ "[GUESS]":0;

# Substitute all transitions with "[GUESSNOUN]" in-place
# with Word before defining the lexicon

read lexc engguesser.lexc
substitute defined Word for "[GUESSNOUN]"
def arch

# Define sibilants orthographically
def Sib [s | s h | z | x | c h ];

# e-epenthesis rule: bus+s > buses, etc.
def ERule "+" -> e || Sib _ Sib ;
def YRule y -> i e || C _ "+" ;
def Cleanup "+" -> 0 ;

def Grammar Lex .o. ERule .o. YRule .o. Cleanup ;
regex Grammar;
